Maryland, session 2026, SB0570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–330.4.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Baby food” means food packaged in a jar, pouch, tub, or box sold
specifically for babies and children under the age of 2 years.
(ii) “Baby food” [does not include infant] INCLUDES:
1. INFANT formula, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(z); AND
2. INFANT CEREAL, AS DEFINED IN 7 C.F.R. § 220.2.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0570*

SENATE BILL 570
(3) “Manufacturer” includes a food manufacturer, food processor, and food
packer.
(4) “Production aggregate” means a quantity of product that is intended to
have uniform composition, character, and quality and is produced according to a master
manufacturing order.
(5) “Proficient laboratory” means a laboratory that:
(i) Is accredited under the standards of the International
Organization for Standardization/International Electrotechnical Commission 17025:2017;
(ii) Uses an analytical method at least as sensitive as the analytical
method described in Section 4.7 of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration Elemental
Analysis Manual for Food and Related Products; and
(iii) Demonstrates proficiency in quantifying each toxic element to at
least 6 micrograms of the toxic element to kilogram of food through an independent
proficiency test by achieving a z–score that is less than or equal to plus or minus two.
(6) “QR code” means a machine–readable code, consisting of an array of
squares, used for storing an Internet website in order to access a webpage.
(7) “Representative sample” means a sample that consists of a number of
units that are drawn based on rational criteria, such as random sampling, and intended to
ensure that the sample accurately portrays the material being sampled.
(8) “Toxic heavy metal” means arsenic, cadmium, lead, or mercury.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or after
January 1, 2025, a person may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale baby food in the State
that contains toxic heavy metals that exceed the limits established by the U.S. Food and
Drug Administration.
(2) A person may sell, distribute, or offer for sale baby food manufactured
before January 1, 2026.
(c) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, each manufacturer of baby food shall test
a representative sample of each production aggregate of the manufacturer’s final baby food
product for each toxic heavy metal.
(2) The testing required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
conducted by a proficient laboratory at least once per month.
(3) A manufacturer may test the final baby food product in accordance with
paragraph (1) of this subsection before packaging individual units of baby food for sale or
distribution.

SENATE BILL 570 3
(d) On the request of the Department, a manufacturer of baby food shall provide
the results of the testing conducted under subsection (c) of this section to an authorized
agent of the Department.
(e) Beginning January 1, 2026, each manufacturer of baby food shall:
(1) Make publicly available on the manufacturer’s website for each baby
food product sold, manufactured, delivered, held, or offered for sale in the State:
(i) The name and level of each toxic heavy metal present in the final
baby food product as determined by the testing conducted under subsection (c) of this
section;
(ii) Sufficient information, such as the product name, universal
product code, or lot or batch number, to enable consumers to identify the final baby food
product; and
(iii) A link to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration’s website that
includes the most recent U.S. Food and Drug Administration guidance and information
about the health effects of the toxic heavy metals on children; and
(2) If the baby food is tested for a toxic heavy metal subject to an action
level, regulatory limit, or tolerance established by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration
under 21 C.F.R. § 109, include on the baby food product label:
(i) The following statement: “For information about toxic element
testing on this product, scan the QR code.”; and
(ii) A QR code or other machine–readable code that allows
consumers to access on the manufacturer’s website or the baby food product information
page:
1. The test results for the toxic heavy metals; and
2. A link to the webpage on the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration website that includes the most recent guidance and information about the
health effects of the toxic heavy metal on children.
(f) If a consumer believes, based on information gathered through the use of the
code included on the baby food product label under subsection (e)(2) of this section, that
baby food is being sold in the State with toxic heavy metals that exceed limits established
by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, the consumer shall report the baby food to the
Department.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.